South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5087.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-11-180 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-11-180.  A state employee entitled to annual leave pursuant to Article 7 of this chapter who is a certified disaster service volunteer of the American Red Cross or a verified Team Rubicon volunteer may be granted leave from work with pay for not more than ten work days in each calendar year to participate in specialized disaster relief services for the American Red Crossapplicable organization. Upon the approval of the employee's employer, the employee must be released from work for this function upon request of the American Red Crossapplicable organization for the services of that employee. This leave is in addition to other leave to which the employee is entitled. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----